Utah statutes.
16-10a-1431.   Procedure for judicial dissolution.
(1)  A proceeding by the attorney general or director of the division to
dissolve a corporation shall be brought in either the district court of the
county in this state in which the principal office of the corporation is
situated or the district court of Salt Lake County.  A proceeding brought by
any other party named in Section 16-10a-1430 shall be brought in the district
court of the county in this state where the corporation's principal office is
located or, if it has no principal office in this state, in the district court
of Salt Lake County.
(2)  It is not necessary to make shareholders parties to a proceeding to
dissolve a corporation unless relief is sought against them individually.
(3)  A court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation may issue
injunctions, appoint a receiver or custodian pendente lite with all powers and
duties the court directs, take other action required to preserve the corporate
assets wherever located, and carry on the business of the corporation until a
full hearing can be held.
